Washington statutes.
RCW 18.06.160

Adoption of rules.

The secretary shall adopt rules in the manner provided by chapter 34.05 RCW as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

[ 1991 c 3 s 15; 1985 c 326 s 16.]